Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Organized Retail Theft Grant Program is established to assist:
(a) Cities and  counties with the costs incurred by local law enforcement agencies in ad-
dressing organized retail theft;
(b) The Department of  State Police with costs incurred by the department in addressing
organized retail theft; and
(c) Community-based organizations in addressing organized retail theft.
(2) The Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission shall administer the grant program de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section and shall award the grants described  in this section.
(3) The commission  shall adopt rules to administer the grant program. Rules adopted
under this section must include:
(a) A methodology for  reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
and
(b) A process  for evaluating the efficacy of programs and services funded by the grant
program.
(4) Moneys distributed to grant recipients under this section  must be spent on costs as-
sociated with addressing and prosecuting organized retail theft.
(5) The  commission shall establish three categories of grants under this section as fol-
lows:
(a) Grants awarded, on a competitive basis, to cities and counties;
(b) Grants awarded, on a competitive basis, to community-based organizations; and
(c) Grants awarded to the department.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for the purposes of the grant program
described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.Enrolled Senate Bill 900 (SB 900-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 900 (SB 900-A) Page 2